California, session 20252026, AB1130.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 84513 of the Government Code is amended to read:84513. (a) (1) If a committee pays a person to post content on an internet website, web application, or digital application for the purpose of supporting or opposing a candidate for elective office or a ballot measure, the person shall concurrently include a disclaimer with that content stating that the person was paid by the committee in connection with the posting.(2) The disclaimer required by this subdivision shall be readily legible to an average viewer or, if the content is in audio format, shall be clearly audible. A disclaimer that states, or is substantially similar to, the following satisfies the requirement in this subdivision: “The author was paid by [name of committee and committee identification number] in connection with this posting.”(3) This subdivision does not apply to the following:(A) Content requiring a disclosure pursuant to Section 84504.3 or subdivision (c) of Section 84511.(B) Content posted on the committee’s own website, profile, or landing page by a person compensated by the committee to post such content.(C) Content posted by a compensated employee of a committee on the employee’s own social media page or account where the only expense or cost of the communication is compensated staff time. This exception shall not apply if the compensated employee of the committee’s principal duties are to post content on their own social media page or account.(b) A committee described in subdivision (a) shall notify the person paid to post the content of the requirement to include a disclaimer. disclaimer and that failure to include the disclaimer may result in penalties under the Political Reform Act of 1974.(c)(1)Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a person in violation of subdivision (a) is not subject to administrative, civil, or criminal penalties under this title.(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if a person accepts payment from a committee to post content that is subject to subdivision (a), and does not include the required disclaimer, that person and the committee shall be jointly and severally liable for any civil or administrative penalties incurred for the violation.(2) If a person violates subdivision (a), the Commission may seek injunctive relief to compel compliance pursuant to Section 90009 after the person is notified of the requirement in subdivision (a).(d) If a committee pays a person as described in subdivision (a) and that payment is required to be reported on a campaign report pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 84211 of the Government Code, the committee shall include on the campaign report a statement that the payment was provided for a paid third party post.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)There continues to be a recognized shortage of dental care professionals in underserved communities throughout the state, and increasing access to dental education and professional licensure for individuals from these communities is essential to ensuring equitable access to oral health care.(b)According to the California Future Health Workforce Commission, the state is projected to face challenges in ensuring adequate access to dental care by 2030, not due to a lack of dentists overall, but because of a maldistribution of the dental workforce.(c)Without targeted efforts to improve workforce distribution and address systemic barriers such as reimbursement rates and regional workforce shortages, underserved areas will continue to experience limited access to dental providers.(d)The federal Health Resources and Services Administration has designated over 570 Dental Health Professional Shortage Areas in California, where millions of residents lack adequate access to dental care providers.(e)Less than 10 percent the state’s dentists are identified as Latino or Black, despite those groups comprising approximately 45 percent of the state’s population, resulting in significant barriers to accessing culturally and linguistically competent care for patients.(f)The cost and complexity of applying to dental school and obtaining licensure are significant barriers for students from underserved communities, especially those who are first-generation college students.(g)Expanding awareness of existing state programs, such as the California Dental Corps Loan Repayment Program, and offering application guidance can help more qualified candidates from underserved areas enter the dental profession and serve in high-need regions.SEC. 2.Article 10 (commencing with Section 1980) is added to Chapter 4 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, to read:10.Outreach and Support Program1980.(a)For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“Board” means the Dental Board of California.(2)“Underserved community” means a geographic area or population group identified in a database compiled by the federal Health Resources and Services Administration, or a medically underserved population, as defined in Section 128552 of the Health and Safety Code.(b)The board shall develop, implement, and maintain an outreach and support program to recruit students from underserved communities in the state to pursue education and licensure in the field of dentistry.(c)As part of the program, the board shall do all of the following:(1)Coordinate with public high schools, community colleges, universities, dental schools, and community-based organizations to identify and engage students from underserved communities with an interest in oral health care professions.(2)Provide accessible information to interested students regarding the educational pathway to becoming a licensed dentist in California, including undergraduate requirements, dental school admissions, licensure examinations, and application procedures.(3)Offer guidance, directly or through partnerships, on preparing for and applying to accredited dental schools, including information on prerequisite coursework, application timelines, personal statement writing, and interview preparation.(4)Provide assistance and information regarding the California Dental Corps Loan Repayment Program established pursuant to Section 1970 and other available financial aid or scholarship opportunities for students pursuing dental education or entering the dental workforce in underserved communities.(5)Conduct at least two outreach activities per year, such as webinars, in-person presentations, or resource fairs, focused on students from underserved communities.(6)Develop and maintain a publicly available webpage containing all of the information required under this section in a clear and comprehensible format in both English and Spanish.(d)The board may collaborate with relevant state and federal agencies, health professional organizations, and accredited educational institutions to carry out the duties described in this section.(e)The board shall provide a summary of actions taken pursuant to this section as part of its report to the Legislature through the sunset review process.